test/src/gt-norm-yamls/M-all_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - tytär - ok : # Noun 'daughter' - ok
     tytär+N+Sg+Nom: tytär
     tytär+N+Sg+Gen: tyttären
     tytär+N+Sg+Par: tytärtä
     tytär+N+Sg+Tra: tyttäreksi
     tytär+N+Sg+Abe: tyttärettä
     tytär+N+Sg+Ine: tyttäressä
     tytär+N+Sg+Ela: tyttärestä
     tytär+N+Sg+Ill: tyttärheen
     tytär+N+Sg+Ade: tyttärellä
     tytär+N+Sg+Abl: tyttäreltä
     tytär+N+Sg+All: tyttärelle
     tytär+N+Sg+Ess: tyttärennä
     tytär+N+Pl+Nom: tyttäret
     tytär+N+Pl+Gen: tyttäriitten
     tytär+N+Pl+Par: tyttäriitä
     tytär+N+Pl+Tra: tyttäriksi
     tytär+N+Pl+Abe: tyttärittä
     tytär+N+Pl+Ine: tyttärissä
     tytär+N+Pl+Ela: tyttäristä
     tytär+N+Pl+Ill: tyttärhiin
     tytär+N+Pl+Ade: tyttärillä
     tytär+N+Pl+Abl: tyttäriltä
     tytär+N+Pl+All: tyttärille
     tytär+N+Pl+Com: tyttärine
     tytär+N+Pl+Ess: tyttärinnä


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - valkkee ok: # Noun 'sak'
     valkkee+N+Sg+Nom: valkkee
     valkkee+N+Sg+Gen: valkkeen
     valkkee+N+Sg+Par: valkkeeta
     valkkee+N+Sg+Tra: valkkeeksi
     valkkee+N+Sg+Abe: valkkeetta
     valkkee+N+Sg+Ine: valkkeessa
     valkkee+N+Sg+Ela: valkkeesta
     valkkee+N+Sg+Ill: valkkeesseen
     valkkee+N+Sg+Ade: valkkeela
     valkkee+N+Sg+Abl: valkkeelta
     valkkee+N+Sg+All: valkkeele
     valkkee+N+Sg+Ess: valkkeena
     valkkee+N+Pl+Nom: valkkeet
     valkkee+N+Pl+Gen: valkkeitten
     valkkee+N+Pl+Par: valkkeita
     valkkee+N+Pl+Tra: valkkeiksi
     valkkee+N+Pl+Abe: valkkeitta
     valkkee+N+Pl+Ine: valkkeissa
     valkkee+N+Pl+Ela: valkkeista
     valkkee+N+Pl+Ill: valkkeissiin
     valkkee+N+Pl+Ade: valkkeila
     valkkee+N+Pl+Abl: valkkeilta
     valkkee+N+Pl+All: valkkeile
     valkkee+N+Pl+Ess: valkkeina
     valkkee+N+Pl+Com: valkkeine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: linnrun analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - venet - ok : # Noun 'borg' - ok
     venet+N+Sg+Nom: venet
     venet+N+Sg+Gen: venheen
     venet+N+Sg+Par: venettä
     venet+N+Sg+Tra: venheeksi
     venet+N+Sg+Abe: venheettä
     venet+N+Sg+Ine: venheessä
     venet+N+Sg+Ela: venheestä
     venet+N+Sg+Ill: venheesseen
     venet+N+Sg+Ade: venheelä
     venet+N+Sg+Abl: venheeltä
     venet+N+Sg+All: venheele
     venet+N+Sg+Ess: venheenä
     venet+N+Pl+Nom: venheet
     venet+N+Pl+Gen: venheitten
     venet+N+Pl+Par: venheitä
     venet+N+Pl+Tra: venheiksi
     venet+N+Pl+Abe: venheittä
     venet+N+Pl+Ine: venheissä
     venet+N+Pl+Ela: venheistä
     venet+N+Pl+Ill: venheissiin
     venet+N+Pl+Ade: venheilä
     venet+N+Pl+Abl: venheiltä
     venet+N+Pl+All: venheile
     venet+N+Pl+Ess: venheinä
     venet+N+Pl+Com: venheine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: linnrun analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - veres - ok : # Noun 'borg' - ok
     veres+N+Sg+Nom: veres
     veres+N+Sg+Gen: vereksen
     veres+N+Sg+Par: verestä
     veres+N+Sg+Tra: verekseksi
     veres+N+Sg+Abe: vereksettä
     veres+N+Sg+Ine: vereksessä
     veres+N+Sg+Ela: vereksestä
     veres+N+Sg+Ill: vereksheen
     veres+N+Sg+Ade: vereksellä
     veres+N+Sg+Abl: verekseltä
     veres+N+Sg+All: verekselle
     veres+N+Sg+Ess: vereksennä
     veres+N+Pl+Nom: verekset
     veres+N+Pl+Gen: veresten
     veres+N+Pl+Par: vereksii
     veres+N+Pl+Par: vereksiitä
     veres+N+Pl+Tra: vereksiksi
     veres+N+Pl+Abe: vereksittä
     veres+N+Pl+Ine: vereksissä
     veres+N+Pl+Ela: vereksistä
     veres+N+Pl+Ill: verekshiin
     veres+N+Pl+Ade: vereksillä
     veres+N+Pl+Abl: vereksiltä
     veres+N+Pl+All: vereksille
     veres+N+Pl+Ess: vereksinnä
     veres+N+Pl+Com: vereksine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: linnrun analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - vuosi - ok : # Noun 'år' - ok
     vuosi+N+Sg+Nom: vuosi
     vuosi+N+Sg+Gen: vuođen
     vuosi+N+Sg+Par: vuotta
     vuosi+N+Sg+Tra: vuođeksi
     vuosi+N+Sg+Abe: vuođetta
     vuosi+N+Sg+Ine: vuođessa
     vuosi+N+Sg+Ela: vuođesta
     vuosi+N+Sg+Ill: vuotheen
     vuosi+N+Sg+Ade: vuođela
     vuosi+N+Sg+Abl: vuođelta
     vuosi+N+Sg+All: vuođele
     vuosi+N+Sg+Ess: vuotena
     vuosi+N+Pl+Nom: vuođet
     vuosi+N+Pl+Gen: vuossiin
     vuosi+N+Pl+Par: vuossii
     vuosi+N+Pl+Tra: vuosiksi
     vuosi+N+Pl+Abe: vuositta
     vuosi+N+Pl+Ine: vuosissa
     vuosi+N+Pl+Ela: vuosista
     vuosi+N+Pl+Ill: vuoshiin
     vuosi+N+Pl+Ade: vuosila
     vuosi+N+Pl+Abl: vuosilta
     vuosi+N+Pl+All: vuosile
     vuosi+N+Pl+Ess: vuosina
     vuosi+N+Pl+Com: vuosine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - yđin - ok : # Noun 'kernel' - ei tsekattu
     yđin+N+Sg+Nom: yđin
     yđin+N+Sg+Gen: ytimen
     yđin+N+Sg+Par: yđintä
     yđin+N+Sg+Tra: ytimeksi
     yđin+N+Sg+Abe: ytimettä
     yđin+N+Sg+Ine: ytimessä
     yđin+N+Sg+Ela: ytimestä
     yđin+N+Sg+Ill: ytimheen
     yđin+N+Sg+Ade: ytimellä
     yđin+N+Sg+Abl: ytimeltä
     yđin+N+Sg+All: ytimelle
     yđin+N+Sg+Ess: ytimennä
     yđin+N+Pl+Nom: ytimet
     yđin+N+Pl+Gen: ytimiitten
     yđin+N+Pl+Par: ytimiitä
     yđin+N+Pl+Tra: ytimiksi
     yđin+N+Pl+Abe: ytimittä
     yđin+N+Pl+Ine: ytimissä
     yđin+N+Pl+Ela: ytimistä
     yđin+N+Pl+Ill: ytimhiin
     yđin+N+Pl+Ade: ytimillä
     yđin+N+Pl+Abl: ytimiltä
     yđin+N+Pl+All: ytimille
     yđin+N+Pl+Com: ytimine
     yđin+N+Pl+Ess: ytiminnä
